Vermont, session 2025-2026, H63.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 496 is amended to read:
§ 496. LEGISLATIVE LEAVE
(a) Any employee who, in order to serve as a member of the General
Assembly, must leave a full-time position in the employ of any employer, shall
be entitled to a temporary or partial leave of absence for the purpose of
allowing the employee to perform any official duty in connection with the
employee’s elected office. The leave of absence shall not cause loss of job
VT LEG #378634 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.63
2025 Page 2 of 2
status, seniority, or the right to participate in insurance and other employee
benefits during the leave of absence. The employer shall continue employment
benefits for the duration of the leave at the level and under the conditions
coverage would be provided if the employee continued in employment
continuously for the duration of the legislative leave. The employer may
require that the employee contribute to the cost of the benefits during the leave
at the existing rate of employee contribution. The employee shall continue to
accrue seniority for the duration of the leave at the same level as if the
employee were employed continuously for the duration of the legislative leave.
Further, an employer shall not discharge or in any other matter retaliate against
an employee who exercises or attempts to exercise the employee’s rights to
serve as an elected official.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378634 v.1